Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.490

Information to be furnished agency.

Upon request, all public officials or agencies shall furnish to the planning agency within a reasonable time such available information as is required for the work of the planning agency.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.490. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 49.]